apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
<sdef n="sint"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<!--paradigmes nous adj -->

<pardef n="contempor/ani__adj"><e><p><l>ànies</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ània</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>anis</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ani</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="afortuna/t__adj"><e><p><l>des</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>da</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ts</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="aliment/ós__adj"><e><p><l>oses</l><r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>osa</l><r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>osos</l><r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ós</l><r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="complex__adj"><e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>os</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>íssimes</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>íssima</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>íssims</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>íssim</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="sangu/ini__adj"><e><p><l>ínies</l><r>ini<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ínia</l><r>ini<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>inis</l><r>ini<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ini</l><r>ini<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="/ossi__adj"><e><p><l>òssies</l><r>ossi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>òssia</l><r>ossi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ossis</l><r>ossi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ossi</l><r>ossi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="guarr/o__adj"><e><p><l>es</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>os</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="cast/ís__adj"><e><p><l>isses</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>issa</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>issos</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ís</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="/ardu__adj"><e><p><l>àrdues</l><r>ardu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>àrdua</l><r>ardu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ardus</l><r>ardu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ardu</l><r>ardu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="dol/ç__adj"><e><p><l>ces</l><r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ça</l><r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ços</l><r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e r="LR"><p><l>çs</l><r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ç</l><r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="/obvi__adj"><e><p><l>òbvies</l><r>obvi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>òbvia</l><r>obvi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>obvis</l><r>obvi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>obvi</l><r>obvi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ro/í__adj"><e><p><l>ïnes</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ïna</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ïns</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>í</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e r="LR"><p><l>ín</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="arqueòl/eg__adj"><e><p><l>ogues</l><r>eg<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>oga</l><r>eg<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>egs</l><r>eg<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>eg</l><r>eg<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="s/avi__adj"><e><p><l>àvies</l><r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>àvia</l><r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>avis</l><r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>avi</l><r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>

<e lm="contemporani"><i>contempor</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="momentani"><i>moment</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rectilini"><i>rectil</i><par n="sangu/ini__adj"/></e>
<e lm="angoixós"><i>angoix</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="extens"><i>extens</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ossi"><i></i><par n="/ossi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bulbós"><i>bulb</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="derivat"><i>deriva</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="suposat"><i>suposa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="simultani"><i>simult</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="llimós"><i>llim</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="resolut"><i>resolu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indefens"><i>indefens</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="borratxo"><i>borratx</i><par n="guarr/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vermellós"><i>vermell</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="precipitat"><i>precipita</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espontani"><i>espont</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="muntanyós"><i>muntany</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lletós"><i>llet</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desconegut"><i>desconegu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="consanguini"><i>consangu</i><par n="sangu/ini__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desafortunat"><i>desafortuna</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fix"><i>fix</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="temorós"><i>temor</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="instantani"><i>instant</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="llis"><i>llis</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incontrolat"><i>incontrola</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impetuós"><i>impetu</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gitano"><i>gitan</i><par n="guarr/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trencadís"><i>trencad</i><par n="cast/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fals"><i>fals</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="verinós"><i>verin</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subdesenvolupat"><i>subdesenvolupa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blavós"><i>blav</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="adequat"><i>adequa</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ardu"><i></i><par n="/ardu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ignominiós"><i>ignomini</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="definit"><i>defini</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glaçat"><i>glaça</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="descalç"><i>descal</i><par n="dol/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mestís"><i>mest</i><par n="cast/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dens"><i>dens</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immens"><i>immens</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="puntegut"><i>puntegu</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obvi"><i></i><par n="/obvi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="roí"><i>ro</i><par n="ro/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="esponjós"><i>esponj</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pervers"><i>pervers</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="corredís"><i>corred</i><par n="cast/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="homòleg"><i>homòl</i><par n="arqueòl/eg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bisellat"><i>bisella</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intens"><i>intens</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fluix"><i>fluix</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subclavi"><i>subcl</i><par n="s/avi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inflamat"><i>inflama</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="coix"><i>coix</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viciós"><i>vici</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enfiladís"><i>enfilad</i><par n="cast/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cutani"><i>cut</i><par n="contempor/ani__adj"/></e>
<e lm="complex"><i>complex</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desmesurat"><i>desmesura</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="interossi"><i>inter</i><par n="/ossi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="curvilini"><i>curvil</i><par n="sangu/ini__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pietós"><i>piet</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intencionat"><i>intenciona</i><par n="afortuna/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dolç"><i>dol</i><par n="dol/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inclòs"><i>inclòs</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inconnex"><i>inconnex</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="invers"><i>invers</i><par n="complex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oficiós"><i>ofici</i><par n="aliment/ós__adj"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
     <par n="guionet"/>
   </e>
